Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2040
Visiting faculty permit; application; department; duties.

Before a visiting faculty permit is issued, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall determine that an accredited school or college of medicine in the State of Nebraska has requested issuance of a visiting faculty permit for the individual involved to serve as a member of the faculty of such school or college of medicine. Any application for issuing a visiting faculty permit shall outline the faculty duties to be performed pursuant to the permit.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 14, p. 2284;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 431;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.08;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 337;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 698.